Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1561.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 1-2509, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1-2509. A. 1. No person, company, governmental
entity, or trust authority may operate an ambulance service within
this state except as provided in this section. The State
Commissioner of Health, the district attorney of the county wherein
the ambulance service operates or may be found, or the Attorney
General of this state shall have the authority to bring an action to
enjoin the operation of any ambulance service not in compliance with
the provisions of this act the Oklahoma Emergency Response Systems
Development Act.
2. A ground ambulance service based outside of this state that
is licensed and in good standing in its home state may respond to an
emergency request for care and transport of a patient within this

state provided no local licensed ambulance service is readily
available, and may be exempt from the licensing requirements of this
state pursuant to rules promulgated by the State Board Commissioner
of Health.
3. Requests for service must be referred by an Oklahoma
emergency dispatch center. The Board Commissioner may require such
exempt ambulance service to subsequently provide documentation of
emergency response activities performed within this state.
4. The State Department of Health shall have the authority to
investigate any complaint associated with an emergency response by
an out-of-state ambulance service in the same manner as ambulance
services licensed by the Department within this state.
B. The Commissioner shall have the authority to revoke or
suspend any license, to issue probationary licenses, or to levy such
administrative fines and penalties as may be deemed necessary,
impose disciplinary actions for violations of the provisions of this
act, the Oklahoma Emergency Response Systems Development Act in
accordance with the severity of the violation and subject to the
provisions of the Administrative Procedures Act. Disciplinary
actions may include, but are not limited to, the following:
1. Revocation or suspension of any license;
2. Probation;
3. A period of free public or charity service;
4. Satisfactory completion of an educational, training, or
treatment program or programs; and
5. Administrative fines and penalties.
C. The powers afforded the Commissioner within the general
enforcement provisions of the Oklahoma Public Health Code are
additionally incorporated herein.
C. D. In addition to any other penalties, any person, company,
governmental entity, or trust authority who violates any of the
provisions of this act the Oklahoma Emergency Response Systems
ENR. S. B. NO. 1561 Page 2

Development Act relating to compliance with the provisions of this
act the Oklahoma Emergency Response Systems Development Act or of
standards, specifications, procedures, and rules adopted by the
Board Commissioner may be punished by the assessment of a civil
penalty of not more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) for each
violation. Each day a violation continues shall be considered a
separate offense.
D. E. The operation or maintenance of an ambulance service in
violation of this act the Oklahoma Emergency Response Systems
Development Act, or the rules promulgated by the Board Commissioner,
is declared a public nuisance inimical to the public welfare. The
Commissioner in the name of the people of the state, through the
Attorney General, or the district attorney of the county in which
the ambulance service is located, may, in addition to other remedies
herein provided, bring action for an injunction to restrain such
violation or to enjoin the future operation or maintenance of any
such ambulance service.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1561 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 5th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 4th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1561 Page 4